Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1472
Anonymous contribution; restrictions on use; other contributions; how treated; violation; penalty.

(1) A person shall not accept or expend an anonymous contribution. An anonymous contribution received by a person shall not knowingly be deposited but shall be given to a tax-exempt charitable organization. The charitable organization receiving the contribution shall provide the person with a receipt. The person shall give a copy of the receipt to the commission.

(2) A contribution received as the result of a fundraising event, or from the sale of political merchandise, or from membership fees, dues, or subscriptions for political purposes to an independent committee that is fifty dollars or less shall not be considered an anonymous contribution.

(3) A person making a contribution pursuant to subsection (2) of this section which is fifty dollars or more shall furnish the recipient with the donor's name, address, and the total amount contributed.

(4) Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 72;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 45.